Washington statutes.
RCW 35.80.040

Discrimination prohibited.

For all the purposes of this chapter and the ordinances adopted as provided herein, no person shall, because of race, creed, color, or national origin, be subjected to any discrimination.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.80.040. Prior: 1959 c 82 s 4.]

NOTES:

Discrimination—Human rights commission: Chapter 49.60 RCW.